Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ast_ES.dic
absolver/ADH
mantener/DH
mañaniar/DH
mazcayar/DH
moler/DH
mover/DH
mullir/DH
ñacer/DH
oyer/ADH
pensar/DH
percorrer/DH
pesllar/DH
poblar/DH
preconcebir/DH
prender/DH
prevenir/DH
promover/DH
protexer/DH
querer/DH
reabrir/DH
rebullir/DH
recayer/DH
recomponer/DH
reconstruyir/DH
reconvertir/DH
recostar/DH
redescubrir/DH
reducir/DH
refacer/DH
referver/DH
refollar/DH
rellozar/DH
remoler/DH
remover/DH
renegar/DH
reñegar/DH
repensar/DH
repolgar/DH
reprender/DH
requerir/DH
resollar/DH
responder/DH
restorcer/DH
retener/DH
retorcer/DH
retrañer/DH
revender/DH
revoltar/DH
riquir/DH
rogar/DH
sabadegar/DH
saponer/DH
segar/DH
sentir/DH
sesgar/DH
sobreentender/DH
sobresalir/DH
sobrevolar/DH
soldar/DH
sollar/DH
sonar/DH
sorber/DH
sorprender/DH
sosegar/DH
superponer/DH
sustituir/DH
tanxer/DH
taramellar/DH
tener/DH
tonar/DH
traducir/DH
trecegar/DH
trescocer/DH
tresllucir/DH
tresponer/DH
triar/DH
tropezar/DH
valir/DH
venir/DH
volar/DH
xoncer/DH
xuxir/DH
